tools/hyphenators/patternbased/se_hyph.tex
pá2j
pá3sit
pá2t1
p1b
pbe1l
p1da
1pe
pe1di
pe2du
3peg
pe3has
pe3jea
pe2ma1
pe2mo
3pen
pe2na
pe1nj
pe2ru
pe2si
pes2t
2pf
p1g
2p1h
1p2i
piá1
pi1b
pi2d
pi1et
pi2gi
pi2ha
3piin
pi1kr
pi1la
pin2g
pi1o
pio1n
pi2sa
pi2si
p1j
pja1
p2l
1pla
p1le.
1plem
p1let
p1lež
p1li
1p2lik
3plise
2plor
p1lu
2p1m2
pma2g
pma2l
pma2r
pma2s
pmi2d
pmi2l
pmis2
pmo1b
pmu2
pmus2
p1n
1po
2p1oa
po2de
po2do
po1e
po2g
2poi
p2ol
po2me
po1ne
po2pl
po2ra
po2ri
po1si
pos2m
p1p
ppa2h
ppá2n
ppá2r
ppe2d
pp2l
p2ple
pp2r
p2ps
pra1n
prá1s
pre1d
pree2
pre3m
p1reš
p2ris
pr2l
p2ro
pro1n
1proš
p1s2
pso1
p2sø
p1š
p1t
pti1m
1pu
pu1be
puc1
pu2gi
pu2mo
pus2t
pu1ta
p2v
py1
py2h
qai1
qer1
qi1h
qi2n
qo2
q1qa
qva1
r2a
2rabb
2rač
1rad
ra1di
ra1e
ra2gu
1rahč
1rahi
1rai
2rak
ra1kr
3raku
1ra1l
ral1d
ra2le
ra2lu
ra3lum
ra3muš
ran2d
ra1nj
2rans
2r1ar
1ras
3rasd
rask2
ra2ša
1ra1šu
ra2tá
rat2l
rat1m
ra1ul
2ražž
rá3be
rá1da
rá1di
rá1du
1ráđ
1ráha
rá1je
r2ák
rá1li
1rámb
1rán
rá1ni
rá1ri
1rásá
rá3sit
2r1áso
1ráss
rá1šu
2rb
r1ba
rbbá2
r1be
rbek2
r1b2m
rbo1l
rbos2
r1bu
rby1
2rc
rca1s
rc2k
rcu1
2rd
r1da.
r1dab
r2dai
rda1s
rdá2l
rddá2
r1de
rden2
r2des
r3det.
r2dit
r2div
rd1j
r3d2n
rd2ra
r2duv
r2ð
3re.
r2ea
re3ala
3rean
1reaŋ
1reá
r2eb
2rebb
1red
redd1
1reg
re2gi
1reh
1rek
1rel
1re2m
rem2l
r2en
1ren.
rena3l
2reŋ
1reo
1rep
re2ra
1res.
res3he
1ret
1rev
1re2z
1rež
2režž
1ré
2r1f
rfe2b
rfi2
rfos2
2rg
rga1b
r2gai
rga1m
rga1n
rga1r
rgá2
r3ge
rge1b
rge2n
rgga3m
rggás3
rgi2
r1g2ŋ
r1go
rgo2l
r2g1r
r1gt
rgu2l
rgu1m
rgu2n
r1gö
2r1h
1ri.
1ria
1riá
ri1ba
rib1m
ri1da
ri1di
rid1j
rid1n
1rie
rie2l
ri1er
ri3evr
1rif
1rig
rigá1
1rih
1riij
3riim
1rik
ri2kl
riko1
rila3s
rimá1
ri1mu
r2in
3rine
1rio
rio2n
ri2os
ri1ot
1rip
1ris
2r1iso
3risv
1riš
1r2it
1riv
rivi1
2rj
r1ja
rja2g
r1já
rjá2n
r1je1
r1ji2
r1jo
r1ju
rj1ä
r1jö
2rk
r1ka
rká1n
r1ke
rke2n
r3ki
rk1j
r1kl
r1ko
rko2l
rko1s
r1ku
rku2m
2r1l
rla1m
rlla2
2r1m
rma1l
rmá1l
rmma2
rm2o
rmo1s
2r1n
rna1
rna2d
rná1
rne2l
rnet2
rno2
rnos2
rn1s
1ro.
2roah
roa2l
1r2oas
ro1be
1roc
1rod
ro3dea
ro3deh
1rof
2rofa
1roh
1roi.
ro1ji
1rok
1rol
ro3lač
ro2li
1rope
ro2pr
1ros
ro1sa
ro3sit
roso2
ro1še
roš1t
ro2u
1rove
ro2w
1rož
2rp
rpál2
rp2h
rpmá3h
rpo1
rpo3r
r1pr
rpu2
r1pä
r1qa2
2r1r
r3ra
rrat2
rrá2
r3re
rre1a
rre1b
rre2n
rri2d
rri2g
rri2s2
r2r1oa
rro2s
r3ru
2rs
r1sa
rsan2
rsa2r
rsá2
r1sc
r1se
rs1h
r1si
rsi1e
r1sj
rs2k
r3ská
r1ske
rs2o
r1s2p
rs2r
rsso2
r1s2t
r1sta
r1su
2rš
r1ša
r1šá
r1ši
r1šo
ršša2
r1šu
2rt
r1tad
r1tah
r1tai
r1tas
r1tá
rtná2
rttá2
rtte2
r1tu
rtu1n
1ru.
ru1be
1ruđ
1ruh
1rui
ru3ine
ru1i2s
2ruk
1rul
ru2la
ru2m
2rumb
rum2l
1run
1ruo
ru2p
1rus
ru2sa
ru3sii
ru2s2t
ru1su
1ruš
ru1ta
1ruth
2rv
r2vai
rva2m
r1ve
r1vi
rvis2
r1vå
2rx1
1ry
ry2la
ry2m
ry1sa
rys1t
2rz
r2za
r2æ
ræ1s2
2rø
r1øl
r1øs.
r1øt
r1øy
2rö
r1åa
rå2s
2r'
2sabb
1sad
sa1e
1sa2ga
sa2gu
1sah
sa3had
sa1is
1saj
1sak
sa2ká
1sal
2sall
sa2ma
s1amb
2samo
1samu
s2an
sa2ná
sa1no
1sare
1sa1ri
s1arm
s1arv
sask2
1sas2t
1saš
sa1šu
s2at
sata1
1sati
1satv
sa2u
1saža
1saže
1saži
1sá
sá1di
sá2du
ságas3
sá2j
sá2l
sá1m
sámi1
sá2mo
sá2mu
sá2na
s1árp
sás2t
s1átn
s1áv
2s1b2
sbá1
sbor2
sbot2
2s1č
s1d
sda2
s2dn
1se.
1sea.
1seag
1seah
1seai
sea2l
1sear
2seat
1seaž
1se1be
1sed
se1di
1seg
1sehi
1sehu
se1is
se2j
se1je
1sel
se2la
1sem2
semb1
se2mo
1se2n
se2ne
1seo
se1pr
1ser
se2ra
3se2s
1seta
1seth
1sev
sfax2
1sfe
2s1fj
sfos2
s1f2r
2s1g2
s1hag
sha2s2
s1hei
sh1oa
shor2
2s1hö
1si.
1sia
1siá
1sib
1si2c
si2di
s1idj
1sie
si1en
si1er
1sif
si1gl
3sih
1siij
3siiv
2s1ij
1sik
1sil
si3lač
si3laš
si3laž
1sim
simá1
1sing
sin1j
1sinu
1sio
si1om
1sir
sira2
si1re
si2ri
1sisa
si3sas
si3sat
1si2se
1sisj
1sisk
1siš
si1tá
1site
1sitl
1siu
1sivr
s1já
s1je
s1ji1
s1jo
sjo1n
s1ju
s1kai
ska3li
3skand
ska2p
ska2r
s1kas
ska1š
s1kat
ská2n
ská2s
s1ke
1skei
ske2n
3skerr
ski1m
1skj
2skk
2s1kl
sko1l
1skop
2skos
sko1ž
s1k2ro
sku2m
1skuo
sku2p
s1kü
sk2v
s1kø
2s1l
sla2g
slan2
2sm
smai2
smat2
s1me
s2me.
sme1b
s2med
s2mei
s2mem
s2miš
s2miv
smo3le
smo1s
s1mu
s2muh
s1mö
s1n2
s2na
2sne2
s2nuh
1so
2s1oa
soar1
3sod
2s1oe2
so2h
so2k
3sol
so3lač
so3laš
so1na
son1j
3soŋ
so2p
so2re
so2ru
so2sa
sos2t
so2t
2s1ovt
2soy.
2s1o2yi
1spáb
1s2pál
1s2pe
spe1d
spi2s
s1p2l
sp2o
sppo2
2s1p2r
s1pä
2s1r
sret2
sro1b
2s1s
ss2á
ssá2r
ssi1b
ssi2d
s2sj
sso1b
sso1k
sso2n1
sso1r
ssu2l
ssu2m
s1š
s1tab
staf2
s2tai
sta3li
sta2n
sta2r
s1taž
stá3da
s2táh
stá2l
s1tár
stá1š
1stáv
s2tea
s2tei
s2tep
s2tež
2st1f
3stitu
s2tiv
stna2
st2o
1stob
sto2m
3strap
s2tri
st2ru
2stt
3stull
3stulo
stu3mi
1stuo
1su.
1sub
su1be
1sud
su2f
1suh
1su2i
sui3s
1suk
1sul
su1la
sulla3
1sum
su2ma
su2me
su2ne
1suo
su2p
1sur
sur2t
su2s
1suse
sus2t
1sutn
s1uvn
1suvv
2s1v
svat2
svá1
svå2
1sy
2syk
syt2
sä2
s1øy
2så
s1ål
s1å2n
s1ås
1ša2d
ša2ga
1šah
1šai
1šao
šas2t
1šatt
šá2b
šádde3
šá2j
šá3le.
šá3lii
šá2m
šá2n
šá3ra
šáre1
1šás
šás2m
šás1t
š1b
š1c
š1č
š3d
1šead
1šeap
še1be
2šei
1šek
še3lis
še1m
še1pr
1šer
1še2s1
šes2k
šeš1
š1f
š1h
1ši.
ši1b
1šie
ši2h
ši1la
ši1m
1šio
š1ip
ši2ri
ši2s
1šiss
šis2t
š1j
š1ka
ška2l
šká2n
š1ke2
š1ki2
š1ko
ško2l
ško2m
š1k2r
š1ku2
š1la
š1li
2šm
š1me
šmi2
šmmo3h
2š1n
2š1oa
šoba2
1šo2d
šo3dan
šogá2
1šoh
šolá2
šo2m
1šon
1šož
š1pr
š1r
š3s2
2š1š
šša2b
šše1a
ššu2m
ššu2n
2št
š1ta.
šta2g
š1tá2
šti2
što2
šu2d
1šui
šu2l
šu2ma
šu2mo
1šun
šu1ni
šus2
1šuva
1šuvd
1šuvn
2š1v
šva2l
1šy
ta3bui
ta2da
ta3dea
ta3ded
3tadet
ta1du
1tae
1taf
1ta1g
ta2gi
ta2gn
ta3had
1tahe
1tahk
tah2l
1tahu
t2ai
ta1ia
tai2n
1tak
t2al
1tale
1talg
1talm
1talt
1talu
1tam
t2an
1tana
ta2ne
1tani
ta1n2j
tar1d
ta1re
1tasa
ta3sa.
ta3sam
ta3saž
ta2sá
1tase
1tasi
1task2
ta1s2p
tast2
taš1t
t2at
1tatg
1ta2to
1tatu
1tau
1tav
1taže
1tá.
1tá2b
1tád
tá3dea
tá3dii
tá1du
1tái.
1tál
1tá2m
1tán
tána3s
tá2ne
tá2nu
1táŋ
tá1ri
1tás
tá3sam
1táse
tá3sii
1táš
tá1ša
1tát
1táž
2t1b2
tbe1l
tbur2
tby2
2t1c
t2c1h
tchu2
2t1č
2t3d
tda2l
1te
t3eadn
teda2
te3dea
2tedj
te1f
2tehp
te1ii
te1in
te1is
te2la
tel2e
te3lek
te1lu
t2em
te2n
ten1a
te2ni
te2pa
ter1s
te1si
te1ša
te2šu
te2t
2tetn
2tett
3teže
3teži
1té
2tf
t1fe
2t1g
tge2
2th
tha2s
t1hea
t1hei
t1hem
t1hi
th2l
t1ho
tho2n
t1hu1
1ti
ti2bi
ti2d
ti1er
ti2et
ti2gi
t2ii
ti3laš
ti3lav
ti3laž
til3d
2tilg
ti3lis
ti2ma
timá1
ti1n2j
ti2on
ti1op
ti1r
ti2ri
ti2sa
2tiš
tit2l
3tivá1
tivo1
2t1j
2tk
t1ka2
tka3š
tká2
t3ke
tke2b
tke2n2
t1k2h
t1ki
t1ko
t1ku2
2t1l
tla2
tlan2
tlá2n
2tm
tmá2l
t1me
tme1b
t1mu
2t1n2
tna2b
tna2g
tna2s
tná2m
tne1b
tne2s
tno1b
tnu2l
tnu2m
1to
2t1oa
toai1
to1b
to2e
tof2
to2gi
tois2
to2mo
to2re
to2ro
t1oss
tos2t
to1tr
tot2t
to1ul
2t1ovd
2t1p2
tpo1
t1r
1t2rah
tra3ne
3trans
2trap
2tras
3t2rái
trá1n
tri1b
tro1d
tro1l
tro3li
tro3si
2tru
trui2
3t2ru1s
try2
2t1s
tsá1
ts2je
ts2l
t3s2o
ts2p
tst2
ts2ve
t2sø
t1š
2t1t
ttar1
tta1t
ttá2r
ttea2
tte1b
tte1v
tt2r
1tu.
tuá1
tu1b
tu1d
tuda2
tu2di
tu3han
3tui
tu1it
1tule
tu2m
tu3me.
1tun
tu2na
2tup
1tur
1tusa
1tusb
1tu2se
1tusg
1tusk
1tuss
tus2t
1tusv
1tut
3tuvad
2t1v
t1wi
1ty
ty2d
tzal1
t1zo
1tä
1tö1
t1åg
tå1l
2ŧ1áh
ŧe1l
ŧes2t
ŧi2
1ŧo
ŧ1ŧ
u1a
ua1l
ua2n
ua1ri
ua2w
u1á
uá1li
uá1r
uba1s
u2b1ár
ub3b2l
u2beh
u2bin
ub1m
ub1or
uco1
učča2
u1dan
uddá2
u1de
ude1l
u2dh
u1dis
ud1j
ud1n
ud1s
u1du
uđa2
uđđa2
uđi2
u1e
u2ei
uel2l
ue1sa
ue1si
u1fe
ufid1
u1fj
u1f2l
u2fr
uga1s
ugges3
uggu2
u2gođ
u2goh
1u2g1r
ugu1h
uhka2
uhká2
u1ho
uhpá2
ui1b
uib2m
uib2o
ui2d1á
ui1d2n
ui3duv
ui1g2ŋ
u1ii
ui1la
ui1le
ui1ra
uis2k
ui3ska
ui3ská
ui3ski
ui3sko
ui3sku
uis2m
ui3sma
uiso2
u2is2t
ui3sti
u1iš
uito2
u1j
ujo3la
uju1h
u1ka1
uka2n
uk1á
u1ko1
uk1r
u1ku
u1lab
u1lač
u1lag
u1lar
u1laš
u1laž
u1lá
ul1da
ul1de
ul1di
ul1du
u1le
ule2n
1ulf
u1li
u2liš
ul1ja
ul1ju
ullo2
ul2ma
ulo1g
ulo1s
ul1s
2ult
ulu2
u1lum
uma2l
u3má
umbo2
1umd
u1me
u1mé
1umh
u3mi.
umis2
u3mit
1umlá
ummos3
umo2
um1oa
umpu2
um2si
u1mu.
umu1l
u1mum
u2na
u1nag
u1nas
un2dá
u1neb
u1ned
u1neh
u1nel
u1nen
u1nes
u1neš
u1net
un3g
u1nii
unis3t
un1ja
un1jo
un2ko
unne2
unno2
unta1
u1oa
uo1ba
u2od
uohpa3
u2oi
uo1j
u2ok
uo1la
uo1le
uo1li
uo1lu
uo1m
uo1me
uo1na
uo1sa
uo2t
u2ov
upa2s
upa1š
1upg
up1l
1upo
up1oa
u1p1r
u1ra
ur3alu
u1rá
urá2d
u2r1ás
ur1da
ur1di
u1re
u1ri
uria2
uri1e
u1ro
u2r1oa
uro2n
uros2
urot2
urra2
u3ru
u1sa.
u1sai
u1sas2
u1saž
u1sei
us1ev
u1sé
us1h
us1j
us3kan
us1ki
us1ko
u1stá
uste2
u1ša
u1šá
u1še
uš1l
ušša2
u1šu
uta2n
ut1ar
ut1ár
ut1h
uti1
utná2
utne1
uto1m
ut2sj
utta2
uttá2
u1tu
1utva
u1u2
u1ve
uvi1h
uvo2
uvva2
uvvo2
u1zo
u1ža
u1že
u1ži
u1žo
ü1be
ü1de
üe2
ü1ey2
ügen2
üh2
ün2d
ünte2
ü1re2
ü1ri
úcu1
ú1sa
1va
vaa2
va3dea
va1di
vala3h
va2ma
va2mo
vams1
va1re
var2v
vas2k
va3šut
vata2
1vá
vádjo3
vá1j
vá2ji
vá2la
vá2mo
vá1ri
vás3tu
v1bu
2vd
v1da2
vda1š
vdá2l
vdá2s
v1de
v1di
vdi2m
v1d2n
v1d2r
v1du
3vearj
ve1du
ve2he
1vei
1vej
vejo1
velo2
velo3h
ve2m
ve2mo
1ven
1ver
ves3t
ve1ša
2v1f
vgá2l
vgi2
v1g2ŋ
v1go
vgo1h
vgu1
1vi.
1via
1viá
1vib
1vic
1vič
1vid
vi1da
2v1idj
vid1n
3viđát
1viđe
1viđi
1vie
vi1em
1vig
1vih
vi2he
1vii
1vi2k
1vil
vi2la
1vim
vi2me
vi2mo
1vin
1vi1o
vi1ra
vi1re
vi2ri
vi1ro
1vis
1viš
1vit
1viv
v1ja
v1já
v1je
vje1h
v1ji
vjjás3
vjjo2
v1jo
v1ju
2vk
v1ka
vka2l
vka2r
v1ke
vke2m
v1ki
v1ko
vko2l
v1ku
2vl
v1la
vla2g
v1lá2
v1le
vle1s
v1li
vlli2
vl2o
vlo2n
vlo2s
v1lu2
v1mö
2vn
v2na
v1ne2
v1ni
v1nj
vnná2
vŋŋá2
3vo
vo1a
v1ođ
vo3lač
vol2l
vo1lu
vo2ma
vo2mo
vo2ni
vo1nj
v2or
vora2
vo3saž
voš2t
vo2va
vox2
vpi2
vppá2
v1pr
2vr
v1ra
v1rá2
v1re
vre2n
v1ri2
vri1l
v1ro
v2roi
vro2s
vrru2
v1ru2
2vs
v1sa
v1se
v1si
vs2k
v1ská
v1ske
v1sko2
v1sku
vssi2
vs2t
v1sta
v1stá
v1sti
vstu1
v1šo
vššá2
2vt
v1ta
v1tá
vtta3v
vtte2
v1tu
3vu
vu1be
vu1la
vuro3h
vuros3
2v1v
vva2r
vvá2r
vvi2d
vvi2s2
vvo2l
vvs1
vya2
v1zo
v1že
v1ži
v1žo2
1vø
v1øy
vå2g
1wa
wai2
wa1ri
w1b
1we
wea2
w1g
wg1o
wha2
wii2
wi2k
1wit
wit2t
w1k2
w1l
w1m
w2n
w1oa
wo1ki
w1re2
ws2
w1st
wuc1
wu1h
wu1l
wux1
w1v
wyo1
x1ah
x1al
x1am
xas2
x1á
xb2
x1br
x1d
x1e
xe1n
x1h
xhal2
xham2
xi1
x1ia
xian2
x1ic
x1i2l
xi2n
x1is
x1k
x1o
x1p2
xpe1
xpi1
x1r
x1sh
x1šo
x1tu
x1v
y1a
y2ad
y2ah
y2ai
y2ak
y2am
ya1s
yas2t
y2aš
yat2
y2av
y1á
y1be2
yc1
y1da1
y1de
yd1i
yd1n
ye1
y1ea
y1e2i
y1e2l1
y1en
yer2s
y1et
y1f
yfi1
y1g
yg2d
ygia2
y2ha
yhan2
yh2r
y2hu
yhu2s
yic1
yida2
yi2do
y2ii
y1is
y1ja
y1jo
y1ka
y1ke
y1ki
y1ko
yko1a
yko1s
y2kv
y1la
y1le
y1li
y2lit
ylo1
y1lu
y2lut
ym1s
y1mu
y1nag
yna2l
yn1d2
y2n1er
y1nes
ynia2
ynk2
y1no
yn1s
ynte1
y1oa
y1o1m
yo1s
y1ot
y1ou
ypda2
yp1r
y1r
yra2l
yra2s
yrat2
yr2d
yr1s
ysat2
ys1av
y2sá
y1si
ysk2
yso3
y2st
ys1tu
y1su
y1ta
yts2
yur3ta
y1v
y2vi
yx1
yä2
ýr1d
1za
za2d
za2g
za2l
zal1c
za2n
zar2d
za2se
zask2
zat2t
1zá
zá2j
zá2l
zá2m
zás2
2z1b
zba2
zbur2
z2d
1ze
ze1b
zee2
ze2m
zer2
zes1
2z1g
z1ho
1zi
zi1b
zi2d
zi2l
zi2s2
z1je
2z1m
zmir2
z1na
znam2
2z1oa
zodi1
z1oi
zo2m
zo2n
zra2
1z2u
zu2g
zu2l
zulu1
zu2m
2z1v
2z1z
2žač
ža1g
1žaga
ža2gi
ža2gu
1žah
1žai1
žai1n
1žak
1ža2l
1žas.
ža3sam
ža2t
1žatg
1žatm
1žatv
1žá
žá2j
žá2la
žás2
1že.
1žeb
1žed
žema1
že2mo
1žes
1žež
1ži.
1žih
1žik
ži2s2
ž1k
2ž1m
ž1oa
ž1oi
žo2ma
žo2n
1žu2
žu2ma
žu2mo
ž1v
2ž1ž
æde2
æd1n
æ1f
æfe2
æ2g
ægr1
æi1r
æ2ki
æ1l
æ2n2
æne1
æ1re
æren2
æ1ri
æri1e
ær2k
æ1ru
ær1øn
æs1k
æso2
æs1t2
æ1sø
ætta1
ä1d
äf2
äi1l
äi2s
ä1l
ä2la
äl2v
ä1mö
ä1n
än2ga
än1s
äpa2
äpe1
ä1r
ärge1
äske1
äs2la
ä1sä
ä1vä
ä1äp
ä1är
ä1äv
øb1
øbin2
ø1d
ø2da
øen2
2øf
øf1j
øfta2
øh2n
øh2r
2øi
ø1ie
øi1n2
øi1s
1øk.
1øka
økka2
ø2la
ø1le
øle1m
ømna2
øna2
øn1s
2øp
ørc2
ørne2
ø1ro
ø2s
øs1á
øtta2
1øy.
1øy2a
øy1n
öb1
öh2n
öh2r
ö1hö
ö1ku
ökul2
ö2la
öl2l
ö2m
ö1n
ö2na
ö2ne1
ör1
ör2i
ör2k
ör2n
ö1sa
ö2s1o
åa2l
å1am
å1a1s
å1b2
å1da2
åd1ne
åd1ni
å2f
åf1j
åfos2
å1g
ågen2
åh2
å2i
åi2a
å1k
åk2ro
åk2s
å2kv
å2la
åm2s1
åne2
ån2n
ån1s
å1o
å1pr
å1re
år2s
å1s2
å2sa
åsen2
å2sf
å2si
å2sk
å2sn
å2st
å1ta2
å2tr
åvi1
å2vø
å1å1l
'1á
'1č
'd2
'1e
'1g
'ha1
'1i
'id1
'1o
'2or
's2
